Alabama, session 2026rs, SB337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-20-10 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§16-20-10
(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that this
section effectuates and carries out its intent in passing
Section 30-5.20 of the Constitution of 2022 during the 2024
Regular Session which was ratified in November of 2024
pursuant to a statewide election.
(b) Upon the request of the Franklin County Board of
Education, the Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources shall issue to the board a deed to all indemnity
lands located in Walker and Fayette counties for which schools
in Franklin County are the sole beneficiary.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
SB337 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB337
Senate 12-Mar-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 07-Apr-26




By: Senator Stutts
Page 2